District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-402

Interpretation of knowledge and notice.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 636, Pub. L. 87-709, § 3
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-102.
1973 Ed., § 41-302.

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 12-184, § 3 ( 45 DCR 7796), eff. March 26, 1999, amends §§ 41-101, 41-102 § 33-401, 33-402, 2001 Ed. without reference to their prior repeal.